Arkansas, session 2025, HB1297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 63, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 21 — Artificial Intelligence, Algorithms, and Other Automated
Technologies

23-63-2101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that
for a given set of human-defined objectives, can make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) "Enrollee" means an individual who is entitled to receive
healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(3)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
*ANS071*
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or
any successor program.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes indemnity and managed care
plans.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan;
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; or
(xi) A nonfederal governmental plan as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(4)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company, hospital
and medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization that
issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state and is subject to:
(i) The insurance laws of this state;
(ii) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(iii) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations.
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(5) "Healthcare provider" means a type of provider that renders
healthcare services to patients for compensation, including a doctor of
medicine or another licensed healthcare professional acting within the
professional's licensed scope of practice; and
(6) "Managed care entity" means an insurance company, hospital
or medical service plan, healthcare provider network, physician hospital
organization, health maintenance organization, healthcare service
corporation, employer or employee organization, or managed care contractor.

23-63-2102. Disclosure of algorithm use — Privacy and data
accessibility.
(a)(1) On and after January 1, 2026, a healthcare insurer that offers,
issues, renews, delivers, or extends a health benefit plan in this state
shall disclose to the following through an applied model card the strengths
and limitations of artificial intelligence-based algorithms, including
without limitation known biases, performance variability, and populations
where artificial based-intelligence algorithms are more less effective, used
or to be used in the healthcare insurer's utilization review process:
(A) The Insurance Commissioner;
(B) A healthcare provider in the healthcare insurer's
network;
(C) An enrollee; and
(D) The general public on the healthcare insurer's
publicly accessible website.
(2) The disclosure under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall include:
(A) The algorithm criteria;
(B) Data sets used to train the algorithm, including
mitigation of any known bias;
(C) The algorithm itself;
(D) A description of how the algorithm is used in an
applied use case;
(E) The outcomes of the software or workflow in which the
algorithm is used; and
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
(F) Any results of independent third-party validation for
improved transparency and trustworthiness.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall ensure that:
(1) An algorithm should leverage federated data-sharing models
to minimize data centralization and protect enrollee privacy;
(2) An algorithm is compliant with national interoperability
standards, including Fast Healthcare Interoperability Resources and the
United States Core Data for Interoperability;
(3) Enrollee data that is used for training or validation of
artificial intelligence models are following privacy and security standards
that align with the Trusted Exchange Framework and Common Agreement; and
(4) Established mechanisms document and obtain explicit enrollee
consent for using health data in artificial development and validation.

23-63-2103. Explanation of artificial intelligence-based algorithm
recommendations.
(a) If artificial intelligence-based algorithms are used in the
utilization review process, the artificial intelligence-based algorithm
recommendations shall be supported by an explanation, understandable at all
literacy levels, of the rationale used by the healthcare insurer-operated
algorithm or system used in making a recommendation to deny, delay, or modify
healthcare services covered under a health benefit plan.
(b)(1) A healthcare insurer using an automated decision-making system
shall identify and cite peer-reviewed studies assessing the automated
decision-making system's accuracy measured against enrollee outcomes and the
validity of automated decision-making systems.
(2) The peer-reviewed studies under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall be concordant or based on easily accessible evidence-based
clinical guidelines, as opposed to proprietary healthcare insurer criteria.
(3) An enrollee shall be provided a process for contesting
enrollee outcomes.

23-63-2104. Clinician supervision of artificial intelligence.
(a) A healthcare insurer shall not make a decision regarding the care
of enrollees based solely on the results derived from the use or application
of artificial intelligence.
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
(b) A healthcare provider who participates in a utilization review
process for a healthcare insurer that initially uses artificial intelligence-
based algorithms for a utilization review determination shall:
(1) Ensure that a utilization review entity guarantees that an
initial adverse prior authorization determination or appeal of an adverse
prior authorization determination or precertification determination is
reviewed by a healthcare provider who:
(A) Possesses a current and valid nonrestricted license to
practice medicine in this state;
(B) Has experience treating patients with the medical
condition or disease for which the healthcare service or supply is being
requested under initial prior authorization determination or appeal;
(C) Is not employed by a utilization review entity, is not
under contract with a utilization review entity other than to participate in
one (1) or more of the utilization review entity’s healthcare provider
networks or to perform reviews of appeals, and does not otherwise have a
financial interest in the outcome of the appeal;
(D) Has not been directly involved in making the adverse
determination; and
(E)(i) Has considered known clinical aspects of the
healthcare service under review, including without limitation:
(a) A review of pertinent medical records
provided to the utilization review entity by the enrollee’s healthcare
provider;
(b) Relevant records provided to the
utilization review entity by a healthcare facility; and
(c) Medical literature provided to the
utilization review entity by the healthcare provider.
(ii) If the decision is an adverse determination,
the healthcare provider shall complete and sign the denial notice, providing
the required information described under this subdivision (b)(1); and
(2) Open and document the review of the individual clinical
records or data before the individualized documented decision of a denial.
(c) The healthcare insurer shall submit to the Insurance Commissioner,
in the form and manner as the commissioner may require, data on the amount of
time a human reviewer spends examining an adverse organizational
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
determination before signing off on each denial under subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) An artificial intelligence-based algorithm shall not be the sole
basis of a decision to deny, delay, or modify healthcare services based in
whole or in part on medical necessity.
(e) An adverse determination of medical necessity shall be made only
by a healthcare provider or a licensed healthcare professional competent to
evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the healthcare services
requested by the healthcare provider as required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, by reviewing and considering the requesting healthcare
provider's recommendation, the enrollee's medical or other clinical history,
as applicable, and individual clinical circumstances.
(f) A healthcare insurer that uses clinical supervision of artificial
intelligence under this section shall provide ongoing education and
certification, if applicable, for a clinician reviewing artificial
intelligence determinations to ensure the clinician's ability to critically
assess artificial intelligence outputs.

23-63-2105. State audit automated utilization management system.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner may audit at any time a healthcare
insurer's automated utilization management system.
(b) The commissioner may contract with a third-party entity to perform
an audit under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) A healthcare insurer that uses an automated decision-making system
shall:
(1) Engage in a regular system audit to ensure use of the
automated decision-making system is not increasing overall or disparate
claims denials or coverage limitations or otherwise decreasing access to
care; and
(2) Publish statistics regarding the automated decision-making
systems’ approval, denial, and appeal rates on the payor's website or another
publicly available website in a readily accessible format with enrollee
population demographics to report and contextualize equity implications of
automated decisions.

23-63-2106. Use of artificial intelligence to shift coverage
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
prohibited.
(a) A healthcare insurer shall:
(1) Reference publicly accessible internal coverage criteria
that are based on current evidence in widely used treatment guidelines or
clinical literature; or
(2) Use artificial intelligence-based algorithms solely to
implement internal coverage criteria that have been made public and adopted
in compliance with this subchapter.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall not use artificial intelligence-based
algorithms that:
(1) Rely on any information not in compliance with this section;
or
(2) Independently change or create coverage criteria.

23-63-2107. Quality assurance testing of artificial intelligence.
(a)(1) A healthcare insurer shall establish an ongoing, biannual
quality assurance testing process that meets requirements established by rule
by the Insurance Commissioner that specify defined parameters on safety and
efficacy of an artificial intelligence-based algorithm.
(2) The requirements under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall meet standardized benchmarks or definitions achieved by consensus-
building at a national level.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall ensure that the artificial
intelligence-based algorithms used in the quality assurance testing process
under subsection (a) of this section are consistent with state and federal
antidiscrimination laws and meet certain parameters of safety and fairness.
(c) A healthcare insurer shall submit the results of the quality
assurance testing under subsection (a) of this section to the commissioner at
the time and in the form and manner as the commissioner may specify, but not
less frequently than semiannually.
(d) The results submitted under subsection (c) of this section shall
be published on a public website within thirty (30) days of the submission of
the results to the commissioner.
(e) Any quality assurance testing shall include:
(1) Validation for generalizability as well as mechanisms to
support local site testing, where necessary, and on-site monitoring
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
applicability for artificial intelligence solutions to ensure safety,
robustness, adaptability, and fairness; and
(2) Testing based on the risk level of the model’s intended use,
with higher-risk applications requiring more rigorous evaluation and
monitoring.
(f)(1) A healthcare insurer shall build capabilities for generating
and curating real-world evidence to ensure artificial intelligence-based
algorithms are tested for the highest standards for safety, accuracy, and
reliability to identify potential risks.
(2) All artificial intelligence solutions shall undergo
benchmarking against standardized metrics approved by the commissioner,
including without limitation safety, efficacy, and reliability in
representative enrollee populations from Arkansas.
(g) Quality assurance testing datasets under this section shall:
(1) Be multi-institutional and representative of Arkansas’s
demographic makeup;
(2) Explain data provenance and origin;
(3) Contain relevant characteristics pertaining to the
artificial intelligence being used; and
(4) Be updated regularly to ensure the highest quality data is
used at all times.
(h) The commissioner shall allocate resources to federally qualified
health centers, critical access hospitals, and rural clinics in this state to
enable participation in quality assurance testing.

23-63-2108. Healthcare insurer requirements.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this
subchapter applies to a healthcare insurer offering a health benefit plan in
this state.
(b) This subchapter does not apply to a managed care entity or
healthcare service contractor that is:
(1) Majority-owned or controlled by a nonprofit hospital,
hospital system, or managed care entity; or
(2) A nonprofit legal entity under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) that
provides a majority of covered professional services in a specific geographic
area through employed healthcare providers or a single contracted medical
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
group.

23-63-2109. Enforcement — Penalties.
If the Insurance Commissioner determines that a healthcare insurer is
not in compliance with this subchapter, the commissioner may impose:
(1) A penalty, including without limitation:
(A) A civil money penalty of not more than twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) for each determination of noncompliance;
(B) A civil money penalty of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) for each week beginning on and after the date on which a
civil money penalty under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section is imposed by
the commissioner during which the deficiency that is the basis of a
determination of noncompliance exists; and
(C) Suspension of enrollment of individuals in health
benefit plans offered by the healthcare insurer on and after the date the
commissioner notifies the healthcare insurer of a determination of
noncompliance and until the commissioner is satisfied that the basis for the
determination has been corrected and is not likely to recur;
(2) Administrative fees, including a fee charged or allocated
for collection activities conducted by the commissioner that will be passed
on to a health benefit plan on a pro-rata basis and added to a civil money
penalty under subdivision (a)(1) of this section collected from the health
benefit plan;
(3) If the commissioner determines that a healthcare provider or
enrollee was adversely affected by the noncompliance of the healthcare
insurer, an amount necessary to compensate the healthcare provider or
enrollee for the harm attributable to the noncompliance that is not otherwise
compensated and may require the healthcare insurer to pay the amount,
including appropriate interest, to the healthcare provider or enrollee in
addition to any other penalties under this section; or
(4) Any other remedy available to the commissioner under state
law.

23-63-2110. No waiver, modification, or nullification by contract.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a writing or
other agreement shall not contain a provision that constitutes a waiver,
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
modification, or nullification of a requirement or remedy under this
subchapter.
(b) This section does not prohibit a writing or other agreement that
grants to a healthcare provider more protection or remedy than contained in
this subchapter or a waiver given in settlement of a dispute or action.

23-63-2111. Private right of action.
(a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in an appropriate
court for declaratory or injunctive relief as is necessary to carry out this
subchapter.
(b) A person who is aggrieved by a violation of this subchapter may
provide written notice of the violation to the Insurance Commissioner.
(c) If the violation of this subchapter is not corrected within ninety
(90) days after receipt of a notice under subsection (b) of this section, the
aggrieved person may bring a civil action in an appropriate court for
declaratory or injunctive relief with respect to the violation.
(d) In a civil action under this section, the court may allow the
prevailing party, other than the state, reasonable attorney's fees, including
litigation expenses, and costs.

23-63-2112. Education artificial intelligence tools.
The Insurance Commissioner may:
(1) Collaborate with academic institutions and healthcare
organizations to establish training programs for ethical artificial
intelligence deployment; and
(2) Fund public-private partnerships to create education
initiatives for a healthcare provider to use artificial intelligence tools.

23-63-2113. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to:
(1) Strengthen oversight and enforcement of existing rules to
ensure health benefit plan compliance with applicable legal and contractual
requirements for coverage and appeals;
(2) Ensure compliance with quality and performance standards;
(3) Ensure that health benefit plan compliance with this
subchapter is not eroded by using artificial intelligence tools, including
02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1297
auto-denial software;
(4) Include continuous post-deployment monitoring of artificial
intelligence to ensure models maintain efficacy and safety; and
(5) Establish a process for biannual reporting and public
disclosure of quality assurance outcomes.

/s/L. Johnson





























02-27-2025 11:07:44 ANS071